Washington statutes.
RCW 18.35.095

Licensure or certification—Inactive status.

(1) A hearing aid specialist licensed under this chapter and not actively practicing may be placed on inactive status by the department at the written request of the licensee. The board shall define by rule the conditions for inactive status licensure. In addition to the requirements of RCW 43.24.086, the licensing fee for a licensee on inactive status shall be directly related to the costs of administering an inactive license by the department. A hearing aid specialist on inactive status may be voluntarily placed on active status by notifying the department in writing, paying the remainder of the licensing fee for the licensing year, and complying with subsection (2) of this section.

(2) Hearing aid specialist inactive licensees applying for active licensure shall comply with the following: A licensee who has not fitted or dispensed hearing instruments for more than five years from the expiration of the licensee's full fee license shall retake the practical or the written, or both, hearing aid specialist examinations required under this chapter and other requirements as determined by the board. Persons who have inactive status in this state but who are actively licensed and in good standing in any other state shall not be required to take the hearing aid specialist practical examination, but must submit an affidavit attesting to their knowledge of the current Washington Administrative Code rules and Revised Code of Washington statutes pertaining to the fitting and dispensing of hearing instruments.

(3) A speech-language pathologist or audiologist licensed under this chapter, or a speech-language pathology assistant certified under this chapter, and not actively practicing either speech-language pathology or audiology may be placed on inactive status by the department at the written request of the license or certification holder. The board shall define by rule the conditions for inactive status licensure or certification. In addition to the requirements of RCW 43.24.086, the fee for a license or certification on inactive status shall be directly related to the cost of administering an inactive license or certification by the department. A person on inactive status may be voluntarily placed on active status by notifying the department in writing, paying the remainder of the fee for the year, and complying with subsection (4) of this section.

(4) Speech-language pathologist, speech-language pathology assistant, or audiologist inactive license or certification holders applying for active licensure or certification shall comply with requirements set forth by the board, which may include completion of continuing competency requirements and taking an examination.

[ 2014 c 189 s 7; 2009 c 301 s 4; 2002 c 310 s 9; 1996 c 200 s 12; 1993 c 313 s 12.]

NOTES:

Work group—2014 c 189: See note following RCW 18.35.010.

Intent—Implementation—2009 c 301: See notes following RCW 18.35.010.

Speech-language pathology assistants—Certification requirements—2009 c 301: See note following RCW 18.35.040.

Effective date—2002 c 310: See note following RCW 18.35.010.